Utah statutes.
26-28-123.   Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is
under jurisdiction of medical examiner.
(1)  Upon request of a procurement organization, a medical examiner shall
release to the procurement organization the name, contact information, and
available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is under the
jurisdiction of the medical examiner.  If the decedent's body or part is
medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, the
medical examiner shall release postmortem examination results to the
procurement organization.  The procurement organization may make a subsequent
disclosure of the postmortem examination results or other information received
from the medical examiner only if relevant to transplantation or therapy.
(2)  The medical examiner may conduct a medicolegal examination by reviewing
all medical records, laboratory test results, x-rays, other diagnostic
results, and other information that any person possesses about a donor or
prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner
which the medical examiner determines may be relevant to the investigation.
(3)  A person that has any information requested by a medical examiner
pursuant to Subsection (2) shall provide that information as expeditiously as
possible to allow the medical examiner to conduct the medicolegal
investigation within a period compatible with the preservation of parts for
the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.
(4)  If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a part of a decedent
whose body is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner and a postmortem
examination is not required, or the medical examiner determines that a
postmortem examination is required but that the recovery of the part that is
the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the
medical examiner and procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely
removal of the part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation,
therapy, research, or education.
(5)  If an anatomical gift of a part from the decedent under the jurisdiction
of the medical examiner has been or might be made, but the medical examiner
initially believes that the recovery of the part could interfere with the
postmortem investigation into the decedent's cause or manner of death, the
medical examiner shall consult with the procurement organization or physician
or technician designated by the procurement organization about the proposed
recovery.  After consultation, the medical examiner may allow the recovery.
(6)  Following the consultation under Subsection (5), in the absence of
mutually agreed upon protocols to resolve conflict between the medical
examiner and the procurement organization, if the medical examiner intends to
deny recovery, the medical examiner or designee, at the request of the
procurement organization, may attend the removal procedure for the part before
making a final determination not to allow the procurement organization to
recover the part.  During the removal procedure, the medical examiner or
designee may allow recovery by the procurement organization to proceed, or, if
the medical examiner or designee reasonably believes that the part may be
involved in determining the decedent's cause or manner of death, deny recovery
by the procurement organization.
(7)  If the medical examiner or designee denies recovery under Subsection (6),
the medical examiner or designee shall:
(a)  explain in a record the specific reasons for not allowing recovery of the
part;
(b)  include the specific reasons in the records of the medical examiner; and
(c)  provide a record with the specific reasons to the procurement
organization.
(8)  If the medical examiner or designee allows recovery of a part under
Subsection (4), (5), or (6), the procurement organization, upon request, shall
cause the physician or technician who removes the part to provide the medical
examiner with a record describing the condition of the part, a biopsy, a
photograph, and any other information and observations that would assist in
the postmortem examination.
(9)  If a medical examiner or designee is required to be present at a removal
procedure under Subsection (6), upon request the procurement organization
requesting the recovery of the part shall reimburse the medical examiner or
designee for the additional costs incurred in complying with Subsection (6).
